Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.050

Application—Renewal—Fees.

Every application for an initial license or a license renewal under this chapter shall be made in writing on a form prescribed by the director with such information as the director requires. The director shall set license fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.

[ 1985 c 7 s 37; 1982 c 66 s 21; 1981 c 43 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 42; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 8; 1937 c 108 s 6; RRS s 8318-1. Formerly RCW 18.39.050, 18.39.060, and 18.39.140.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 c 66: See note following RCW 18.39.240.